North Carolina statutes. Chapter 139. Soil and Water Conservation Districts.
Article 2. Watershed Improvement Districts.

§§ 139-16 through 139-20.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, ss. 2-6.

§ 139-20.1.
Validation of creation of certain districts.

All actions had and taken prior to March 1, 1963, by supervisors of soil and water conservation districts, boards of county commissioners, boards of election, registrars, or other officials in the course of attempting to form and create watershed improvement districts, are hereby ratified, approved, validated and confirmed, as if accomplished in full and complete compliance with the law, and any watershed improvement district with respect to which formation may have been attempted and completed prior to March 1, 1963, is hereby declared to be lawfully formed, created, and in all respects constituted a legal and valid watershed improvement district.

History.

1963, c. 918, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 5 changed the term “registrar” to “chief judge” throughout Chapter 163. It appears the reference to “registrars” above should now be a reference to “chief judges.”

§§ 139-21 through 139-30.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, ss. 7-16.

§ 139-31.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 1228, s. 9.

§§ 139-32 through 139-36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, ss. 17-21.

§§ 139-37,
139-37.1.

Recodified as G.S 139-48, 139-49 by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, ss. 22, 23.

§ 139-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, s. 24.